Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1737.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13A03 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 13A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Public official." As defined in section 1102 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. Section 13A04 of Title 65 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 13A04. Registration.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (a.1) Prohibition.--A public official convicted of a felony crime on or after the effective date of this subsection may not register as a lobbyist under this chapter.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1737PN2139 - 2 - 12345